Florida, session 2026, HB1529.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 782.08, Florida Statutes, is amended to
read:
782.08 Assisting self-murder; penalties.—
(1) A Every person who knowingly, by force or duress,
causes another person to commit or attempt to commit
deliberately assisting another in the commission of self-murder
commits shall be guilty of manslaughter, a felony of the first
second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083,
or s. 775.084.
(2) A person who:
(a) Intentionally aids or abets another person to commit
or attempt to commit self-murder;
(b) Provides the physical means by which another person
commits or attempts to commit self-murder;
(c) Participates in the physical act by which another
person commits or attempts to commit self-murder; or
(d) Intentionally advises or encourages another person to
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1529-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1529 2026
commit or attempt to commit self-murder

commits a felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in
s. 755.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1529-00